6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX uC Y 43
SFX uC battre battre/m't's' battre po:infi
SFX uC battre battant/m't's' battre po:ppre
SFX uC battre battu battre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX uC battre battus battre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX uC battre battue battre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX uC battre battues battre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX uC battre bats/m't' battre po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX uC battre bat/s' battre po:ipre po:3sg
SFX uC battre battons battre po:ipre po:1pl
SFX uC battre battez battre po:ipre po:2pl
SFX uC battre battent/s' battre po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX uC battre battais/m't' battre po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX uC battre battait/s' battre po:iimp po:3sg
SFX uC battre battions battre po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX uC battre battiez battre po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX uC battre battaient/s' battre po:iimp po:3pl
SFX uC battre battis/m't' battre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX uC battre battit/s' battre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX uC battre battîmes battre po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX uC battre battîtes battre po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX uC battre battirent/s' battre po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX uC battre battrai/m' battre po:ifut po:1sg
SFX uC battre battras/t' battre po:ifut po:2sg
SFX uC battre battra/s' battre po:ifut po:3sg
SFX uC battre battrons battre po:ifut po:1pl
SFX uC battre battrez battre po:ifut po:2pl
SFX uC battre battront/s' battre po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX uC battre battrais/m't' battre po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX uC battre battrait/s' battre po:cond po:3sg
SFX uC battre battrions battre po:cond po:1pl
SFX uC battre battriez battre po:cond po:2pl
SFX uC battre battraient/s' battre po:cond po:3pl
SFX uC battre batte/m's' battre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX uC battre battes/t' battre po:spre po:2sg
SFX uC battre battisse/m' battre po:simp po:1sg
SFX uC battre battisses/t' battre po:simp po:2sg
SFX uC battre battît/s' battre po:simp po:3sg
SFX uC battre battissions battre po:simp po:1pl
SFX uC battre battissiez battre po:simp po:2pl
SFX uC battre battissent/s' battre po:simp po:3pl
SFX uC battre bats/t' battre po:impe po:2sg
SFX uC battre battons battre po:impe po:1pl
SFX uC battre battez battre po:impe po:2pl
SFX uD Y 33
SFX uD battre battre/s' battre po:infi
SFX uD battre battant/s' battre po:ppre
SFX uD battre battu battre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX uD battre battus battre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX uD battre battue battre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX uD battre battues battre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX uD battre bat/s' battre po:ipre po:3sg
SFX uD battre battons battre po:ipre po:1pl
SFX uD battre battez battre po:ipre po:2pl
SFX uD battre battent/s' battre po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX uD battre battait/s' battre po:iimp po:3sg
SFX uD battre battions battre po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX uD battre battiez battre po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX uD battre battaient/s' battre po:iimp po:3pl
SFX uD battre battit/s' battre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX uD battre battîmes battre po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX uD battre battîtes battre po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX uD battre battirent/s' battre po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX uD battre battra/s' battre po:ifut po:3sg
SFX uD battre battrons battre po:ifut po:1pl
SFX uD battre battrez battre po:ifut po:2pl
SFX uD battre battront/s' battre po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX uD battre battrait/s' battre po:cond po:3sg
SFX uD battre battrions battre po:cond po:1pl
SFX uD battre battriez battre po:cond po:2pl
SFX uD battre battraient/s' battre po:cond po:3pl
SFX uD battre batte/s' battre po:spre po:3sg
SFX uD battre battît/s' battre po:simp po:3sg
SFX uD battre battissions battre po:simp po:1pl
SFX uD battre battissiez battre po:simp po:2pl
SFX uD battre battissent/s' battre po:simp po:3pl
SFX uD battre battons-nous battre po:impe po:1pl ds:+pr
SFX uD battre battez-vous battre po:impe po:2pl ds:+pr
SFX vA Y 42
SFX vA ettre ettre/n'q'd'l'm't's' mettre po:infi
SFX vA ettre ettant/n'q'l'm't's' mettre po:ppre
SFX vA ettre is/L'D'Q' mettre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX vA ettre ise/L'D'Q' mettre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX vA ettre ises/D'Q' mettre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX vA ettre ets/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX vA ettre et/n'q'l'm't's' mettre po:ipre po:3sg
SFX vA ettre ettons/n'q'l't' mettre po:ipre po:1pl
SFX vA ettre ettez/n'q'l'm' mettre po:ipre po:2pl
SFX vA ettre ettent/n'q'l'm't's' mettre po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX vA ettre ettais/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX vA ettre ettait/n'q'l'm't's' mettre po:iimp po:3sg
SFX vA ettre ettions/n'q'l't' mettre po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX vA ettre ettiez/n'q'l'm' mettre po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX vA ettre ettaient/n'q'l'm't's' mettre po:iimp po:3pl
SFX vA ettre is/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX vA ettre it/n'q'l'm't's' mettre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX vA ettre îmes/n'q'l't' mettre po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX vA ettre îtes/n'q'l'm' mettre po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX vA ettre irent/n'q'l'm't's' mettre po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX vA ettre ettrai/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre po:ifut po:1sg
SFX vA ettre ettras/n'q'l'm't' mettre po:ifut po:2sg
SFX vA ettre ettra/n'q'l'm't's' mettre po:ifut po:3sg
SFX vA ettre ettrons/n'q'l't' mettre po:ifut po:1pl
SFX vA ettre ettrez/n'q'l'm' mettre po:ifut po:2pl
SFX vA ettre ettront/n'q'l'm't's' mettre po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX vA ettre ettrais/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX vA ettre ettrait/n'q'l'm't's' mettre po:cond po:3sg
SFX vA ettre ettrions/n'q'l't' mettre po:cond po:1pl
SFX vA ettre ettriez/n'q'l'm' mettre po:cond po:2pl
SFX vA ettre ettraient/n'q'l'm't's' mettre po:cond po:3pl
SFX vA ettre ette/n'q'j'l'm't's' mettre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX vA ettre ettes/n'l'm't' mettre po:spre po:2sg
SFX vA ettre isse/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre po:simp po:1sg
SFX vA ettre isses/n'q'l'm't' mettre po:simp po:2sg
SFX vA ettre ît/n'q'l'm't's' mettre po:simp po:3sg
SFX vA ettre issions/n'q'l't' mettre po:simp po:1pl
SFX vA ettre issiez/n'q'l'm' mettre po:simp po:2pl
SFX vA ettre issent/n'q'l'm't's' mettre po:simp po:3pl
SFX vA ettre ets/n'l'm't' mettre po:impe po:2sg
SFX vA ettre ettons/n'l' mettre po:impe po:1pl
SFX vA ettre ettez/n'l'm' mettre po:impe po:2pl
