6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.dic
admettre/vA()
commettre/vA()
compromettre/vA()
décommettre/vA()
démettre/vA()
ébattre/uC()
émettre/vA()
entrebattre/uD()
mainmettre/vA()
mettre/vA()
omettre/vA()
permettre/vA()
promettre/vA()
réadmettre/vA()
réémettre/vA()
remettre/vA()
retransmettre/vA()
soumettre/vA()
télétransmettre/vA()
transmettre/vA()
